fst/morphology/affixes/verb_suffixes.lexc
LEXICON VAI-n_IND_3
@D.number.PL@+3Sg:@D.number.PL@%>0 VERBS_Endlex ;
@D.number.PL@+3Sg+Dial:@D.number.PL@%>iw VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl:%>w%>ak VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+Dial:%>iw%>ak VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>iýiwa VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>âniwân VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>inâniwan VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>âniwiw VERBS_Endlex ; ! ???
+X:%>inâniwiw VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VAI-m_IndependentSuffixes
@R.person.NI@ VAI-m_IND_1 ;
@R.person.KI@ VAI-m_IND_2 ;
@R.person.NULL@ VAI-m_IND_3 ;

LEXICON VAI-m_IND_1
@D.number.PL@+1Sg:@D.number.PL@%>n2 VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl:%>n2ân VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VAI-m_IND_2
@D.number.PL@+2Sg:@D.number.PL@%>n2 VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>n2ânaw VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>n2aw VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl:%>n2âwâw VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VAI-m_IND_3
@D.number.PL@+3Sg:@D.number.PL@%>m VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl:%>mw%>ak VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>miýiwa VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>niwân VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>niwiw VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VAI_ConjunctSuffixes
@R.infl.VAI-ae@ VAI-ae_ConjunctSuffixes ;
@R.infl.VAI-io@ VAI-io_ConjunctSuffixes ;
@R.infl.VAI-n@ VAI-n_ConjunctSuffixes ;
@R.infl.VAI-m@ VAI-m_ConjunctSuffixes ;

LEXICON VAI-ae_ConjunctSuffixes
@D.number.PL@ VAI-ae_CNJ_SG ;
VAI-ae_CNJ_PL ;

LEXICON VAI-ae_CNJ_SG
+1Sg:%>yân VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg:%>yan VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg:%>t VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VAI-ae_CNJ_PL
+1Pl:%>yâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>yahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl:%>yêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl:%>c%>ik VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>ýit VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>hk VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>niwik VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>niwahk VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VAI-io_ConjunctSuffixes
@D.number.PL@ VAI-io_CNJ_SG ;
VAI-io_CNJ_PL ;

LEXICON VAI-io_CNJ_SG
+1Sg:%>yân VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg:%>yan VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg:%>t VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VAI-io_CNJ_PL
+1Pl:%>yâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>yahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl:%>yêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl:%>c%>ik VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>ýit VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>hk VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>niwik VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>niwahk VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VAI-n_ConjunctSuffixes
@D.number.PL@ VAI-n_CNJ_SG ;
VAI-n_CNJ_PL ;

LEXICON VAI-n_CNJ_SG
+1Sg:%>iyân VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg:%>iyan VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg:%>k VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+Dial:%>it VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VAI-n_CNJ_PL
+1Pl:%>iyâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>iyahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl:%>iyêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl:%>k%>ik VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+Dial:%>ic%>ik VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>iýit VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>âniwik VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>ihk VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>inâniwik VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>inâniwahk VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VAI-m_ConjunctSuffixes
@D.number.PL@ VAI-m_CNJ_SG ;
VAI-m_CNJ_PL ;

LEXICON VAI-m_CNJ_SG
+1Sg:%>mân VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg:%>man VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg:%>hk VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VAI-m_CNJ_PL
+1Pl:%>mâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>mahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl:%>êk VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl:%>hk%>ik VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>miýit VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>mihk VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VAI_ConditionalSuffixes
@R.infl.VAI-ae@ VAI-ae_ConditionalSuffixes ;
@R.infl.VAI-io@ VAI-io_ConditionalSuffixes ;
@R.infl.VAI-n@ VAI-n_ConditionalSuffixes ;
@R.infl.VAI-m@ VAI-m_ConditionalSuffixes ;

LEXICON VAI-ae_ConditionalSuffixes
@D.number.PL@ VAI-ae_COND_SG ;
VAI-ae_COND_PL ;

LEXICON VAI-ae_COND_SG
+1Sg:%>yân%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg:%>yan%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg:%>c%>i VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VAI-ae_COND_PL
+1Pl:%>yâhk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>yahk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>yahk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl:%>yêk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl:%>twâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>ýic%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>hk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VAI-io_ConditionalSuffixes
@D.number.PL@ VAI-io_COND_SG ;
VAI-io_COND_PL ;

LEXICON VAI-io_COND_SG
+1Sg:%>yân%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg:%>yan%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg:%>c%>i VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VAI-io_COND_PL
+1Pl:%>yâhk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>yahk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>yahk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl:%>yêk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl:%>twâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>ýic%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>hk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VAI-n_ConditionalSuffixes
@D.number.PL@ VAI-n_COND_SG ;
VAI-n_COND_PL ;

LEXICON VAI-n_COND_SG
+1Sg:%>iyân%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg:%>iyan%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg:%>ic%>i VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VAI-n_COND_PL
+1Pl:%>iyâhk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>iyahk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>iyahk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl:%>iyêk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl:%>itwâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl:%>kwâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>iýic%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>hk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VAI-m_ConditionalSuffixes
@D.number.PL@ VAI-m_COND_SG ;
VAI-m_COND_PL ;

LEXICON VAI-m_COND_SG
+1Sg:%>mân%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg:%>man%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg:%>hk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VAI-m_COND_PL
+1Pl:%>mâhk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>mahk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>mahk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl:%>mêk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl:%>hkwâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>miýic%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>mihk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VAI_ImperativeSuffixes
@R.infl.VAI-ae@ VAI-ae_ImperativeSuffixes ;
@R.infl.VAI-io@ VAI-io_ImperativeSuffixes ;
@R.infl.VAI-n@ VAI-n_ImperativeSuffixes ;
@R.infl.VAI-m@ VAI-m_ImperativeSuffixes ;

LEXICON VAI-ae_ImperativeSuffixes
! Immediate
@D.number.PL@+Imm+2Sg:@D.number.PL@0 VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+21Pl:%>tân VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl:%>k VERBS_Endlex ;
! Delayed
@D.number.PL@+Del+2Sg:@D.number.PL@%>hkan VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+21Pl:%>hkahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Pl:%>hkêk VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VAI-io_ImperativeSuffixes
! Immediate
@D.number.PL@+Imm+2Sg:@D.number.PL@0 VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+21Pl:%>tân VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl:%>k VERBS_Endlex ;
! Delayed
@D.number.PL@+Del+2Sg:@D.number.PL@%>hkan VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+21Pl:%>hkahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Pl:%>hkêk VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VAI-n_ImperativeSuffixes
! Immediate
@D.number.PL@+Imm+2Sg:@D.number.PL@%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+21Pl:%>itân VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl:%>ik VERBS_Endlex ;
! Delayed
@D.number.PL@+Del+2Sg:@D.number.PL@%>îhkan VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+21Pl:%>îhkahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Pl:%>îhkêk VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VAI-m_ImperativeSuffixes
! Immediate
@D.number.PL@+Imm+2Sg:@D.number.PL@%>a VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+21Pl:%>tân VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl:%>mok VERBS_Endlex ;
! Delayed
@D.number.PL@+Del+2Sg:@D.number.PL@%>môhkan VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+21Pl:%>môhkahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Pl:%>môhkêk VERBS_Endlex ;

!! VTI inflection

LEXICON VTI_Inflection
@R.order.Ind@+Ind:@R.order.Ind@ VTI_IndependentSuffixes ;
@R.order.Cnj@+Cnj:@R.order.Cnj@ VTI_ConjunctSuffixes ;
@R.order.Cond@@D.conjunct.CC@+Cond:@R.order.Cond@@D.conjunct.CC@ VTI_ConditionalSuffixes ;
@R.order.Cond@@R.conjunct.CC@+Cond+Inf:@R.order.Cond@@R.conjunct.CC@ VTI_ConditionalSuffixes ;
@R.order.Imp@+Imp:@R.order.Imp@ VTI_ImperativeSuffixes ;

LEXICON VTI_IndependentSuffixes
@R.infl.VTI-ae@ VTI-ae_IndependentSuffixes ;
@R.infl.VTI-io@ VTI-io_IndependentSuffixes ;
@R.infl.VTI-m@ VTI-m_IndependentSuffixes ;

LEXICON VTI-ae_IndependentSuffixes
@R.person.NI@ VTI-ae_IND_1 ;
@R.person.KI@ VTI-ae_IND_2 ;
@R.person.NULL@ VTI-ae_IND_3 ;

LEXICON VTI-ae_IND_1
@D.number.PL@+1Sg:@D.number.PL@%>n2 VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl:%>n2ân VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTI-ae_IND_2
@D.number.PL@+2Sg:@D.number.PL@%>n2 VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>n2ânaw VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>n2aw VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl:%>n2âwâw VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTI-ae_IND_3
@D.number.PL@+3Sg:@D.number.PL@%>w VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl:%>w%>ak VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>ýiwa VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>niwân VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>niwiw VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTI-io_IndependentSuffixes
@R.person.NI@ VTI-io_IND_1 ;
@R.person.KI@ VTI-io_IND_2 ;
@R.person.NULL@ VTI-io_IND_3 ;

LEXICON VTI-io_IND_1
@D.number.PL@+1Sg:@D.number.PL@%>n2 VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl:%>n2ân VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTI-io_IND_2
@D.number.PL@+2Sg:@D.number.PL@%>n2 VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>n2ânaw VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>n2aw VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl:%>n2âwâw VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTI-io_IND_3
@D.number.PL@+3Sg:@D.number.PL@%>w VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl:%>w%>ak VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>ýiwa VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>nâniwân VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>nâniwiw VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTI-m_IndependentSuffixes
@R.person.NI@ VTI-m_IND_1 ;
@R.person.KI@ VTI-m_IND_2 ;
@R.person.NULL@ VTI-m_IND_3 ;

LEXICON VTI-m_IND_1
@D.number.PL@+1Sg:@D.number.PL@%>ên VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl:%>ênân VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTI-m_IND_2
@D.number.PL@+2Sg:@D.number.PL@%>ên VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>ênânaw VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>ênaw VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl:%>ênâwâw VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTI-m_IND_3
@D.number.PL@+3Sg:@D.number.PL@%>am VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl:%>am%>wak VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>amiýiwa VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>aniwân VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>aniwiw VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTI_ConjunctSuffixes
@R.infl.VTI-ae@ VTI-ae_ConjunctSuffixes ;
@R.infl.VTI-io@ VTI-io_ConjunctSuffixes ;
@R.infl.VTI-m@ VTI-m_ConjunctSuffixes ;

LEXICON VTI-ae_ConjunctSuffixes
@D.number.PL@ VTI-ae_CNJ_SG ;
VTI-ae_CNJ_PL ;

LEXICON VTI-ae_CNJ_SG
+1Sg:%>yân VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg:%>yan VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg:%>t VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTI-ae_CNJ_PL
+1Pl:%>yâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>yahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl:%>yêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl:%>c%>ik VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>ýit VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>hk VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>niwik VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>niwahk VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTI-io_ConjunctSuffixes
@D.number.PL@ VTI-io_CNJ_SG ;
VTI-io_CNJ_PL ;

LEXICON VTI-io_CNJ_SG
+1Sg:%>yân VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg:%>yan VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg:%>t VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTI-io_CNJ_PL
+1Pl:%>yâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>yahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl:%>yêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl:%>c%>ik VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>ýit VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>hk VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>nâniwik VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>nâniwahk VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTI-m_ConjunctSuffixes
@D.number.PL@ VTI-m_CNJ_SG ;
VTI-m_CNJ_PL ;

LEXICON VTI-m_CNJ_SG
+1Sg:%>amân VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg:%>aman VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg:%>ahk VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTI-m_CNJ_PL
+1Pl:%>amâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>amahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl:%>amêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl:%>ahk%>ik VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>amiýit VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>amihk VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTI_ConditionalSuffixes
@R.infl.VTI-ae@ VTI-ae_ConditionalSuffixes ;
@R.infl.VTI-io@ VTI-io_ConditionalSuffixes ;
@R.infl.VTI-m@ VTI-m_ConditionalSuffixes ;

LEXICON VTI-ae_ConditionalSuffixes
@D.number.PL@ VTI-ae_COND_SG ;
VTI-ae_COND_PL ;

LEXICON VTI-ae_COND_SG
+1Sg:%>yân%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg:%>yan%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg:%>c%>i VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTI-ae_COND_PL
+1Pl:%>yâhk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>yahk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>yahk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl:%>yêk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl:%>twâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>ýic%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>hk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTI-io_ConditionalSuffixes
@D.number.PL@ VTI-io_COND_SG ;
VTI-io_COND_PL ;

LEXICON VTI-io_COND_SG
+1Sg:%>yân%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg:%>yan%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg:%>c%>i VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTI-io_COND_PL
+1Pl:%>yâhk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>yahk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>yahk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl:%>yêk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl:%>twâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>ýic%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>hk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTI-m_ConditionalSuffixes
@D.number.PL@ VTI-m_COND_SG ;
VTI-m_COND_PL ;

LEXICON VTI-m_COND_SG
+1Sg:%>amân%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg:%>aman%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg:%>ahk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTI-m_COND_PL
+1Pl:%>amâhk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>amahk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>amahk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl:%>amêk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl:%>ahkwâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>amiýic%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>amihk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTI_ImperativeSuffixes
@R.infl.VTI-ae@ VTI-ae_ImperativeSuffixes ;
@R.infl.VTI-io@ VTI-io_ImperativeSuffixes ;
@R.infl.VTI-m@ VTI-m_ImperativeSuffixes ;

LEXICON VTI-ae_ImperativeSuffixes
! Immediate
@D.number.PL@+Imm+2Sg:@D.number.PL@0 VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+21Pl:%>tân VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl:%>k VERBS_Endlex ;
! Delayed
@D.number.PL@+Del+2Sg:@D.number.PL@%>hkan VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+21Pl:%>hkahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Pl:%>hkêk VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTI-io_ImperativeSuffixes
! Immediate
@D.number.PL@+Imm+2Sg:@D.number.PL@0 VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+21Pl:%>tân VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl:%>k VERBS_Endlex ;
! Delayed
@D.number.PL@+Del+2Sg:@D.number.PL@%>hkan VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+21Pl:%>hkahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Pl:%>hkêk VERBS_Endlex ;
